Mississippi, session 2026, HB1090.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. The Department of Mental Health and community mental health centers shall expand outpatient services and community-based services for former inmates of the Department of Corrections who are no longer incarcerated within a correctional institution of the Department of Corrections.  The expanded outpatient services and community-based services shall be for such former inmates who were diagnosed with a mental illness while housed within a state correctional institution of the Department of Corrections.  The expansion of the outpatient services and community-based services shall be paid out of any available funds appropriated for such expansion of services for the former incarcerated inmates of the Department of Corrections. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.